Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 4 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION
§ 49-417. Idaho wildlife special plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for any one (1) of three (3) Idaho wildlife special license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.

In addition to the regular operating fee, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the fish and game set-aside account pursuant to section 36-111, Idaho Code, for use in the nongame wildlife program. This fee shall be treated as a contribution to the nongame wildlife program, and shall not be considered a motor vehicle registration fee as described in section 17, article VII, of the constitution of the state of Idaho.

The fish and game commission shall designate one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) of each initial fee and seventy-five cents (75¢) of each renewal fee from the elk wildlife special plate to the department of fish and game’s wildlife disease laboratory program to be used for testing, surveillance and detection of diseases that may affect wildlife including, but not limited to, chronic wasting disease.

The state controller shall annually, by August 1 of each year, transfer an amount equivalent to one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) of each initial elk wildlife special plate and seventy-five cents (75¢) of each renewal elk wildlife special plate sold in the prior fiscal year from the fish and game set-aside account to the department of agriculture’s livestock disease control fund to be used for testing, surveillance and detection of wildlife diseases and domestic livestock diseases that may affect wildlife including, but not limited to, brucellosis and chronic wasting disease.

The state controller shall annually, by August 1 of each year, transfer an amount equivalent to two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) of each initial cutthroat wildlife special plate and one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) of each renewal cutthroat wildlife plate sold in the prior fiscal year from the fish and game set-aside account to the department of parks and recreation fund [park and recreation fund] established in section 67-4225, Idaho Code, for the construction and maintenance of nonmotorized boating access facilities for anglers.

Each Idaho wildlife license plate shall be of a color and design acceptable to the board of directors of the Idaho fish and wildlife foundation and approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. The Idaho fish and wildlife foundation is authorized to design more than one (1) wildlife plate, but the department may not allow more than three (3) different designs to be in use at any one (1) time. Initial costs of the plate program including costs of plate design shall be paid by the Idaho fish and wildlife foundation.
(4) Sample Idaho wildlife plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account to be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty dollars ($20.00) of the purchase fee shall be deposited in the fish and game set-aside account pursuant to section 36-111, Idaho Code, for use in the nongame wildlife program.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. He may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

§ 49-417A. Idaho timber special plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for Idaho timber special license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.

In addition to the regular operating fee, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the department of lands fund for use in reforestation activities on state lands, provided however, that prior to the beginning of any fiscal year, the state board of land commissioners may agree that funds made available under this section to the department of lands for the coming year would better further reforestation objectives of the management and conservation of forest resources on public and private lands in the state if expended for educational efforts set forth in this section.

The Idaho timber license plate shall be of a color and design acceptable to the members of the Idaho forest products commission and approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the director of the department of lands from funds appropriated to that department.

Sample Idaho timber plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be deposited in the department of lands fund for use in reforestation activities or educational efforts as set forth in this section.

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee of each timber special license plate, and twenty dollars ($20.00) for each sample timber special license plate, shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the department of lands. Funds so deposited and subsequently directed by the state board of land commissioners for educational efforts as set forth in this section shall be expended as agreed by the state board of land commissioners upon recommendations developed jointly by the department of lands and the Idaho forest products commission. Such efforts may include signs or other appropriate means designed to help build public understanding of reforestation or the management and conservation of forest resources on public and private lands in Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. He may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

§ 49-417B. Idaho agriculture plates.

On and after January 1, 2000, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for Idaho agriculture plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho agriculture plates for other vehicles may be authorized by rule of the board.

In addition to the regular operating fee, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of the administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by warrant on a monthly basis by the Idaho transportation department to Idaho ag in the classroom created by the provisions of section 57-815, Idaho Code.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

The Idaho agriculture license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design which features Idaho agriculture shall be acceptable to the Food Producers of Idaho, Inc. and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including the cost of plate design, shall be paid from the ag in the classroom account.

Sample Idaho agriculture plates may be purchased from the department for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred by warrant on a monthly basis by the Idaho transportation department to Idaho ag in the classroom.

§ 49-417C. Famous potatoes license plates.

On and after January 1, 2001, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special famous potatoes license plates in lieu of regular license plates. Availability of famous potatoes license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Idaho potato commission created in chapter 12, title 22, Idaho Code, and shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in subsection (17) of section 22-1207, Idaho Code.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The famous potatoes license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The distinguishing feature of the license plate shall be a representation of a prepared Idaho potato with a melting pat of butter. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the Idaho potato commission and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho potato commission.

Sample famous potatoes license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the Idaho potato commission. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-417D. Idaho rangeland plates.

On and after January 1, 2009, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for Idaho rangeland plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho rangeland plates for other vehicles may be authorized by rule of the board.

In addition to the regular registration fee, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of the administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to an Idaho rangeland resource commission account provided in section 58-1415, Idaho Code.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

The Idaho rangeland license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design which features Idaho rangelands shall be acceptable to the Idaho rangeland resource commission and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including the cost of plate design, shall be paid from the Idaho rangeland resource commission account.

Sample Idaho rangeland plates may be purchased from the department for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the Idaho rangeland resource commission account.

§ 49-417E. Natural resources and mining education plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 9, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-418. Veterans plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive special veterans license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of veterans plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

Proof of being a current or former member of the United States armed forces must be furnished to the department before special veterans plates will be issued. Acceptable proof shall be a copy of form DD214 or an equivalent document or statement from the department of veterans affairs.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the applicant shall pay the initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and the annual program fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) as specified in section 49-402, Idaho Code, and the plate fee specified in section 49-450, Idaho Code. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial program fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Fifteen dollars ($15.00) of the initial program fee and five dollars ($5.00) of the annual program fee shall be deposited to the veterans cemetery maintenance fund created in section 65-107, Idaho Code, and shall be used to operate and maintain a state veterans cemetery.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The veterans license plate design shall include the colors red, white and blue, shall designate one (1) of the five (5) branches of military service, and display either:

The word “VETERAN”;

The name of a conflict or war period recognized by the United States department of veterans affairs for the purpose of awarding federal veterans benefits as defined in 38 U.S.C. 101(11); or

For a current or former member of the United States armed forces who has served in Afghanistan or Iraq during the post 9/11 global operations period, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 4110A(c), the name of the post 9/11 global operations theater.

The license plate design shall comply with all applicable rules of the department and shall include a separate and distinct numbering system. The design, color, and numbering system shall be subject to approval of the department.

§ 49-418A. Idaho college and university plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for special plates featuring one (1) of Idaho’s colleges or universities. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho college and university special license plates for other vehicles may be authorized by rule of the board.

In addition to the regular operating fee, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account to be used by the department to fund highway, road and bridge construction projects and to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. The department shall transfer twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of the initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of the renewal fee for deposit to the institution designated on the license plate.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

All special college and university plates shall be of a color and design comparable to the standard issue of license plates with blue numerals on a red, white and blue background and shall indicate the participating institution.

The standard red, white and blue graphic shall be used, except that the word “Idaho” and “Famous Potatoes” shall appear on every plate, the identification of county shall be omitted, and the inscription “Scenic Idaho” may be omitted.

Each college or university that chooses to participate in this program shall provide that portion of the design which features the particular institution and such design shall be acceptable to the president of the institution. For public colleges and universities, approval of the state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho shall also be required.

The state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho shall adopt rules to account for receipt and distribution of revenues accruing to participating public colleges and universities from the special license plate program. Revenues from the special plate program shall be used to:

Fund scholarships for Idaho residents attending that college or university.

Match funds contributed in equal amounts from nonstate sources for academic programs, provided that such expenditures for public colleges and universities shall be subject to prior approval by the state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho.

For the purposes of this section, nonpublic colleges and universities shall mean and are limited to: The College of Idaho located in Caldwell, Idaho; Northwest Nazarene University located in Nampa, Idaho; and Brigham Young University-Idaho located in Rexburg, Idaho.
(7) Sample college and university license plates may be purchased from the department for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be retained by the department for deposit to the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred by the department to the college or university designated on the license plate. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

Each version of the special college and university plate featuring the participating college or university shall be approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including the cost of plate design, shall be paid by the participating college or university.

§ 49-418B. Idaho youth plates.

On or after January 1, 2000, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho youth license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho youth plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of the administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the county assessor’s motor vehicle registration division of each county into the youth programs fund of the sheriff of that county, for use in implementation of prevention and early intervention programs for Idaho’s at-risk youth including, but not limited to: (a) providing mentoring programs, (b) creating safe places and structured activities in nonschool hours, (c) fostering good health, (d) developing effective education opportunities for marketable career skills, and (e) providing an opportunity for youth to give back to their community.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho youth license plate shall be of a color and design comparable to the standard issue of license plates with blue numerals on a red, white and blue background, except that the word “Idaho” shall appear on each plate and the county designator shall be omitted to provide for distinguishing designs and slogans, acceptable to the Idaho association of counties, to be added to the plate. The design shall be approved by the department and shall utilize a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho association of counties.

Sample Idaho youth license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be deposited in the sheriff’s youth program fund of the county where the plate was purchased for the implementation of youth programs for at-risk youth. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-418C. Firefighters license plates.

On and after January 1, 2001, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special firefighters license plates in lieu of regular license plates. Availability of firefighters license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Idaho fire chiefs association in Boise, Idaho, and shall be used exclusively for the fire safety education of firefighters, fire chiefs and the general public.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The firefighters license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The distinguishing feature of the license plate shall be a representation of firefighters in action. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the Idaho fire chiefs association and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho fire chiefs association.

Sample firefighters license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the Idaho fire chiefs association. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-418D. Military veteran motorcycle license plate.

On and after January 1, 2006, any person who is the owner of a motorcycle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive a military veteran motorcycle license plate in lieu of a regular motorcycle license plate.

Proof of being a current or former member of the United States armed forces must be furnished to the department before a military veteran motorcycle plate will be issued. Acceptable proof shall be a copy of form DD214 or an equivalent document or statement from the department of veterans affairs.

In addition to the annual registration fee required in section 49-402(3), Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the initial issuance of a plate, and fifteen dollars ($15.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial program fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special motorcycle license plate program. Fifteen dollars ($15.00) of the initial program fee and five dollars ($5.00) of the annual program fee shall be deposited to the veterans cemetery maintenance fund created in section 65-107, Idaho Code, to operate and maintain a state veterans cemetery.

Whenever title or interest in a motorcycle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plate to another motorcycle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plate on another motorcycle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The military veteran motorcycle license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. In addition, there shall be no decals to indicate the veteran’s branch of service or the period of duty served; the plate shall display the words “Scenic Idaho” at the top and “Veteran” at the bottom of the plate; and the license plate design shall be approved by the department and any portion of the design which represents veterans shall be acceptable to the administrator of the Idaho division of veterans services and a unique numbering system shall be utilized by the department.

§ 49-418E. Idaho elks rehabilitation hospital plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 10, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-419. Idaho snowskier plates.

On and after January 1, 1999, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho snowskier license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho snowskier license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the division of tourism [and promotion] fund within the department of commerce for use in general promotion of Idaho’s ski industry.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho snowskier license plate shall be of a color and design comparable to the standard issue of license plates with blue numerals on a red, white and blue background, except that the word “Idaho” shall appear on each plate and the county designator shall be omitted to provide for distinguishing designs and slogans, acceptable to the Idaho ski areas association, to be added to the plate. The design shall be approved by the department and shall utilize a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho ski areas association.

Sample Idaho snowskier license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be deposited in the division of tourism [and promotion] fund within the department of commerce for use in general promotion of Idaho’s ski industry. Any moneys expended by the department of commerce for promotion of Idaho’s ski industry shall be done in consultation with the Idaho ski area [areas] association. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-419A. Idaho sawtooth national recreation area plates.

On and after January 1, 2000, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon department approval receive Idaho sawtooth national recreation area license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho sawtooth national recreation area plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the park and recreation fund established in section 67-4225, Idaho Code, for use in the maintenance of parks and facilities. This fee shall be treated as a contribution to the outdoor recreation program and shall not be considered a motor vehicle registration fee as described in section 17, article VII, of the constitution of the state of Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho sawtooth national recreation area license plate design shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design which features the Idaho sawtooth national recreation area shall be acceptable to the sawtooth society and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including the cost of the plate design, shall be paid by the sawtooth society.

Sample Idaho sawtooth national recreation area plates may be purchased from the department for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the park and recreation fund for use in the maintenance of parks and facilities. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-419B. Idaho motorcycle safety program plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 11, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-419C. Idaho white water rafting plates.

On and after January 1, 2004, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special Idaho white water rafting license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho white water rafting license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit to the tourism and promotion fund of the department of commerce, and shall be used by the department of commerce for the general education and promotion of Idaho’s white water rivers and the rafting and kayaking industries. The department of commerce shall confer with the consulting panel representing white water river communities and the rafting and kayaking industries before expending any moneys from the fund that were received into the fund from revenue derived from this special license plate program.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho white water rafting license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the department of commerce and the consulting panel representing Idaho’s white water river communities and the rafting and kayaking industries, and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the department of commerce. Not more than fifteen percent (15%) of all revenues made available to the department of commerce from the sale and renewal of Idaho white water rafting license plates shall be used by the department of commerce to pay for the costs of the plate design and for those administrative expenses necessarily incurred by operation of the general education and promotion program.

§ 49-419D. Idaho school transportation safety awareness plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.